Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-442
Permit areas; post signs; free permit, employees.

The commission shall post signs at all entrances to permit areas and the text of such signs shall clearly convey the fact that motor vehicles using the area are required to display a permit. The commission may issue free permits for the private motor vehicles of its employees who are required to reside on a permit area by the terms of their employment.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1110;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 152.